 "Now we have 4-month-old rats that are not diabetic and that were diabetic before," he added.
 Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific division, said the study is still in its early stages.
 Like some other experts, he is skeptical about the cure for diabetes, noting that these findings are not relevant to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Nobel Literature Prize Committee of the Swedish Academy, publicly announced during a Sveriges Radio program in Sweden that the committee, unable to contact Bob Dylan directly about the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, had abandoned its efforts to contact him.
 Danius said: "At the moment we are not doing anything. I have called and emailed and received very friendly replies from his closest collaborator. For the time being, that is certainly enough."
 Previously, the CEO of Ring, Jamie Siminoff, commented that the company came about when his doorbell could not be heard from his store in his garage.
 He set up a wireless doorbell, he said.
 Siminoff said sales increased after his 2013 appearance on Shark Tank, in which the show's judges rejected the startup's funding.
 Siminoff was featured on the shopping channel QVC in late 2017.
 Ring also won a lawsuit against a competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 Although an experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, to date, no drug has been clearly considered as suitable for treating existing infection.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially showed promise in the field, but formal studies indicated it had less benefit than hoped in preventing death.
 ZMapp was used as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments in the PALM study.
 The U.S. gymnastics team supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and agrees with the absolute necessity of the Olympic family promoting a safe environment for all our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that the interests of our athletes and clubs, and their sports, can best be served by moving forward with meaningful change within our organization, rather than decertification.
 The U.S. gymnastics team supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse that was so bravely reported by survivor, Larry Nassar, could have happened without anyone noticing, and supports any changes that are necessary and appropriate.
 The U.S. gymnastics team and the USOC have the same goal — to make gymnastics and any other sport as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a respectful, healthy and positive environment.
 Through the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy and his adviser, and then for the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 elections, he advised Carter on foreign policy, then served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, as the successor to Henry Kissinger.
 As a member of the NSA, he helped Carter in conducting world diplomatic affairs, such as the Camp David Accords in 1978; the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s; the Iranian Revolution, which led to the hostage crisis in 1979; and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, received nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and Stone were honored with nominations for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Other nominations include Best Picture, Director, Cinematography, Costume Design, Original Score, Production Design, Sound Editing, Sound Mixing and Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, received nominations for best original song. Studio Lionsgate received 26 nominations - more than any other studio.
 On Sunday night, the President of the United States, Donald Trump, in a statement broadcast by the press secretary, announced that American troops would leave Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump had a phone conversation with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also take custody of Islamic State members who, the statement said, European nations had refused to repatriate.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that is already well accepted, but also offers details that are not found so often in fossils, such as colors and the three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists claim that the upper plumage of this animal was chestnut and the lower part was light or carotenoid.
 The discovery also provides clues about the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The feathers of dinosaurs, known as rake, do not have a well-developed stem, but have other characteristics, such as spines and barbs. In view of this, the researchers concluded that the rake was possibly the result of an evolutionary development after these other characteristics.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for display or temperature regulation. The researchers suggested that although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample has the plumage of an adult, not a juvenile.
 The researchers suggested that, despite the tail being from a young dinosaur, the sample reveals an adult plumage, not a down.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at the police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty other people.
 The governor's office said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they suspected the attacker was a Daesh (ISIL) militant.
 They found that the sun operated on the same basic principles as other stars: the activity of all stars in the system was determined by their luminosity, their rotation and nothing else.
 Luminosity and rotation are used together to define a star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is in terms of magnetic reversals.
 During his trip, Iwasaki encountered problems on many occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates on both 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 This will allow it to be compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of its predecessors, theoretically, with a maximum throughput of 600 Mb/s.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not make a great impression on Miller, to whom the story was reported.
 When asked for a comment, Miller said, "Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I was preparing, so I wasn't paying much attention to what he was saying."
 "We will strive to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020, compared with the 2005 level," Hu said.
 He did not set a value for the cuts, saying they would be made according to China's economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing countries "to avoid the old path of polluting first and cleaning up later".
 He added that "they should not, however, be asked to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, responsibility and capabilities."
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12:00 GMT today.
 He warns that there is no guarantee that any action in Iraq at this time will prevent sectarian war, increased violence or the trend toward chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and consensus-building in the United States on Middle East policy.
 The report criticized almost every aspect of the current policy of the Executive in relation to Iraq and insists on an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to re-establish diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 Current senator and Argentina's first lady Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner announced her candidacy for president yesterday afternoon in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Mrs Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Teatro Argentina, the same venue she used to launch her 2005 senate campaign as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The debate began with a controversy over spending on relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives have humorously dubbed "The Bush New Orleans Agreement."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to people with influence in Washington.
 More than 4 million people went to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people present was so large that it was not possible for everyone to have access to the funeral in St. Peter's Square.
 Several large TVs were installed in various places in Rome so that the people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar arrangements were made, allowing for the accompaniment by a large number of people.
 Historians have criticized former FBI agents for directing resources to easy-to-solve cases, especially car thefts, in order to boost the agency’s popularity.
 Congress began funding the obscenity initiative in fiscal year 2005 and specified that the FBI must devote 10 agents to adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa made the highest score of the Innings, 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, had a good performance and made a century partnership.
 But after failing to hit the captain's target, India only managed to make 36 runs and lost 7 wickets, ending the innings.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long visit to Asia.
 He was received by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore's Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of defeats in the midterm election, Bush spoke publicly about expanding trade in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to send the government's "Clean Air Act" to a committee of all parties for review, before its second reading, following a 25-minute meeting Tuesday with NDP Leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 Layton requested changes to the Conservative Party's environmental bill during a meeting with the Prime Minister, calling for a "thorough and complete rewrite" of the Conservative Party's environmental bill.
 Since the federal government intervened to take over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some federal MPs have not liked this act and have classified it as a maneuver in the prelude to the federal election that will be called in November.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said the act was only to protect the hospital's facilities from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government by giving it an extra 45 million Australian dollars.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level readings indicated the emergence of a tsunami. There was some tsunami activity recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but the island was temporarily without electricity, which prevented local authorities from receiving the tsunami warning sent by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii located on the coast and in the vicinity were closed throughout Wednesday despite the warnings having been lifted.
 The US president, George W. Bush, welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe, Bush's spokesman, called the North Korean pledge "an important step toward the goal of achieving verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 The tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed in the Atlantic Ocean today.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) says that at this time, Jerry does not pose a threat to land.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 15 cm of rain could breach the previously damaged levees.
 The Ninth Ward, which saw flooding of 6 meters during Hurricane Katrina, is currently at waist-level, as the nearest levee was overtopped.
 Water is pouring over the dam in a 100-foot-wide section.
 Adam Cuerden, administrator of Commons, expressed his disappointment with the deletions when he spoke with Wikinews last month.
 "He [Wales] basically lied from the beginning. First, acting as if it was for a legal reason. Second, pretending he was years listening, until his exclusion from articles"
 Community irritation led to the current efforts to create a policy regarding sexual content for the site that hosts millions of open-license media files.
 The work done was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations made by the Sagittarius galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and the Milky Way.
 Just as the Moon exerts a pull on the Earth, causing the tides, the Milky Way exerts a force on the Sagittarius galaxy.
 Scientists have been able to conclude that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that normal matter does.
 This theory states that most of the dark matter in the vicinity of a galaxy is located in the vicinity of a galaxy in a kind of halo and is composed of several tiny particles.
 Television reports show the white smoke coming out of the plant.
 Local officials are warning residents near the plant to stay inside, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to the Japanese nuclear agency, radioactive calcium and iodine were identified in the plant.
 Authorities believe this indicates that the containers may have been breached and are leaking uranium fuel.
 Dr. Tony Moll discovered extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) in the KwaZulu-Natal region of South Africa.
 He warned that the new variant was "very worrying and alarming because of the high mortality rate", in an interview.
 According to Dr. Moll, some patients may have contracted the virus in the hospital and at least two were health professionals.
 In a year, an infected person can infect between 10 and 15 close contacts.
 However, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total group of people with tuberculosis still appears to be low; 6,000 out of a group of 330,000 individuals infected at any one time in South Africa.
 The satellites, both weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at approximately 17,500 miles per hour, collided at an altitude of 491 miles.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was intense.
 They are still trying to determine the size of the accident and how the land will be affected.
 The U.S. Strategic Command, part of the Defense Department, is tracking the debris.
 The result of the analysis of the graph will be made available on the public website.
 A doctor who worked at the Children's Hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after her mother was found dead in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, Ohio authorities said.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the side of the road wearing a T-shirt and underwear in an apparently under-medicated state.
 She pointed out her black Oldsmobile Intrigue 150 meters away to the police.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blood-stained blankets.
 Police said the body appeared to have been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease, this season, were reported in late July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then migrates to humans through mosquitoes.
 The outbreak led the Indian government to take certain measures such as, the installation of pig collectors in severely affected areas, distribution of thousands of mosquito nets and spraying of pesticides.
 Millions of vaccine doses against encephalitis have also been promised by the government, which will help prepare health agencies for next year.
 Plans for vaccines that would be given to historically more affected areas this year were delayed because of a lack of funds and low priority in relation to other diseases.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where he began working for the Swedish Postal Service after three years, and became its main recorder.
 He produced more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is of such recognized quality and detail that he is one of the few famous people among philatelists, some of whom specialize in collecting only his work.
 His 1,000th stamp was the magnificent "The Great Achievements of the Swedish Kings", by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, in 2000, which is listed in the Guinness Book of Records.
 He was also involved in the engraving of banknotes for many countries, and recent examples of his work included the portraits of the Prime Minister on the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was moved to a hospital, but died shortly thereafter.
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident more or less at 12:00 GMT the same day.
 "There were kids waiting to cross the street and they were all screaming and crying," said a witness who was working in a garage near the accident scene.
 They all ran back to the place where the accident had occurred.
 Other issues on the agenda in Bali include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to complete a fund to help countries affected by global warming to cope with the impacts.
 The money could go to flood-proof homes, better water management, as well as crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some to prevent women from talking about their health had not succeeded.
 She came to this conclusion due to the sheer number of positive comments and encouragement she received from both male and female individuals, asking that contraceptive medication be considered a medical necessity.
 When the fighting ceased, after the wounded were transported to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining inmates remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to rectify the situation, but the demands of the prisoners were not clear.
 Between 10 p.m. and 11 p.m. (MDT), the inmates set fire to the prison.
 So, police officers prepared with riot gear entered the yard and cornered the inmates with tear gas.
 The rescue teams managed to put out the fire at 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal floods that spread sediment throughout the river stopped.
 This sediment was essential to create sand banks and beaches, which served as habitat for wildlife.
 Consequently, two species of fish went extinct, and two others are at risk, such as the Gila cypha species.
 Although the water level only rises a few meters after the flood, the authorities hope that it will be enough to rescue the sandbanks eroded in the direction of the current.
 No tsunami alert was issued and according to the geophysical agency of Jakarta there is no need, since the earthquake did not reach the magnitude of 6.5.
 Although there was no threat of a tsunami, residents began to panic and abandon their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey cried at her farewell, she made it clear to fans that she would return.
 "This will not be a farewell. It is the closing of a chapter and the opening of a new one."
 The final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections indicated that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a large margin.
 The party in power, the South West African People's Organization (SWAPO), also won a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 The coalition and Afghan troops moved into the area to protect the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to assist.
 The accident occurred at a high altitude in mountainous terrain, and is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are being hampered by bad weather and hostile terrain.
 The medical charities Médecins Sans Frontières and the World Health Organization say it is the worst outbreak in the country.
 The spokesman for Medecines Sans Frontiere, Medecines Sans Frontiere, said: "Angola is heading for its worst outbreak ever, the situation remains very bad in the country."
 The games started at 10am with good weather and, despite the quick morning shower, it was a perfect day for 7s rugby.
 The tournament's top seed, South Africa, started off with a bang, winning 26-0 against 5th-ranked Zambia.
 Clearly rusty in the game against their southern sisters, South Africa, however, improved consistently as the tournament progressed.
 Their disciplined defense, the ability to handle the ball and excellent teamwork made them stand out and it was clear that this was the team to beat.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum declare that the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a risk to public health, as they argue that it was in imminent danger of falling.
 The cut was scheduled for Tuesday, but was suspended after an emergency court decision.
 All of the cave entrances, which have been named "The Seven Sisters", are at least 100 to 250 meters (328 to 820 feet) in diameter.
 Infrared images show that temperature variations from night to day indicate that they are probably caves.
 They are cooler than the surrounding surface during the day and warmer at night.
 "Its thermal behavior is not as stable as the large caves on planet Earth, which tend to preserve a fairly constant temperature, but it is consistent with the fact that they are deep holes in the ground," said Glen Cushing, of the Astrogeology Team of the United States Geological Survey (USGS) and the University of Northern Arizona, located in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: Voters withdraw to a booth and deposit a pre-printed ballot into an envelope.
 After the officials check the voter's identity, the voter inserts the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voting list.
 French electoral law codifies the procedures quite rigorously.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes must be transparent, so that voters and observers can witness that no envelope is present at the beginning of the vote and that no envelope is added, except those of the duly counted and authorized voters.
 Candidates may send representatives to observe all parts of the process. During the night, votes are counted by volunteers under careful supervision, following specific procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, recently launched worldwide with improved functionality and aimed at reducing costs, has become a much-discussed topic at the 2007 IT Month in Taipei.
 But the consumer market for notebooks will be radically varied and transformed after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station's website describes the show as "an old-school radio theater with a hilarious nerdy twist!"
 In its early days, the program was exclusively presented on the long-lived TogiNet Radio, a site focused on spoken radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 The previous program featured amateur voice actors who lived in East Texas.
 It is said that the looting continued throughout the night, while the police were not seen on the streets of Bishkek.
 The city of Bishkek was described as sinking into a state of "anarchy", according to one observer, as mobs of people roamed the streets and looted shops of consumer goods.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the southern protesters for the illegality.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a Tri Nations rugby match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustemburgo, South Africa.
 The final score was a one-point win, 21-20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it ended a run of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the last match of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks ago.
 The final match of the series will take place at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks play Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 No immediate reports of damage were received by the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) or the National Earthquake Information Center.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 The strain of the deadly bird flu virus H5N1 has been confirmed as having infected a wild duck found dead on Monday in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country in the European Union to suffer from this virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for "deaths everywhere, destruction and terrorization of millions and millions of Earth's inhabitants."
 Chambers, who is agnostic, argues that the process is "frivolous" and that "anyone can sue anyone."
 The story presented in the French opera, by Camille Saint-Saëns, is about an artist "whose life is dictated by love of drugs and Japan."
 As a result, the actors smoke marijuana-based cigarettes on stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join them.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Governor Rick Perry and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann finished in fourth, fifth and sixth places, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but said harsh words against Romney, whose name was shown in negative campaign ads in Iowa against Gingrich.
 Perry said he would "go back to Texas to look at the results of tonight's party convention and determine if there is a path forward for me in this race," but later said he would remain in the race and participate in the January 21 South Carolina primary.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames Straw Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 According to reports, he was in his early 20s. In a statement, Bieber said that, "While I was not present nor directly involved in this tragic incident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 According to the entertainment news website TMZ, the photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Boulevard Sepulveda and tried to take pictures of the police stop before crossing the road and continuing, taking the California Highway Patrol officer who was conducting the traffic stop to order him to turn back, twice.
 According to police, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be criminally charged.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, a considerable number of countries failed to win medals.
 They include the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen placing ninth in the standing (upright) women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland, with Katja Saarinen placing tenth in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, Australian, finished 11th in the men's Super-G. The Czech competitor, Oldrich Jelinek, finished sitting in 16th in the men's Super-G.
 Arly Velasquez of Mexico finished 15th in the men's Super-G. Adam Hall of New Zealand finished ninth in the men's Super-G.
 Polish skier Maciej Krezel, who is visually impaired, and guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super-G. South Korea's Jong Seork Park finished 24th in the men's Super-G sitting event.
 The UN peacekeepers, who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, are being blamed for spreading the disease, which began near the troops' camp.
 According to the lawsuit, waste from the UN camp was not properly treated, which caused the emergence of bacteria in the tributary of the Artibonite River, one of the largest in Haiti.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti had not had a cholera outbreak since 1800.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies that suggest that the UN peacekeeping battalion in Nepal, without realizing it, brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was probably caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital has declared the patient as having a condition considered stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where some cases of the Ebola virus occurred.
 The hospital has followed the infection control protocol, including separating the patient from others, to prevent possible infections in others.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked on various attractions in various positions.
 During the 1980s, he worked on programs such as Taxi, Cheers and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped create The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars each season in royalties.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 Later reports said the plane was threatened with a bomb and was diverted back to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Initial reports say the plane was sent back to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an ageing and poorly maintained fleet for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions prevented the purchase of new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crash killed three people and injured three more.
 Last month, Iran suffered its worst air disaster in years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 It happened again in the same month in Mashhad, another commercial plane entered a runway and hit a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the remaining shows of its tour.
 The rock band was supposed to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after Steven Tyler, the band's lead singer, was injured when he fell off the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray suffered a first-set defeat in the tie-break after the two served in the set.
 Del Potro maintained an initial advantage in the second set, but this also demanded a tiebreaker after reaching 6-6.
 Pony received treatment on the shoulder, but managed to return to the game.
 The program began at 20h30 local time (15.00 Coordinated Universal Time).
 Famous singers across the country offered Bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening began with the presentation of the singer Singer Sanju Sharma, accompanied by Jai Shankar Choudhary. The chhappan bhog bhajan was also presented. The singer Raju Khandelwal was accompanying him.
 So, Lakkha Singh took the lead to sing the bhajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (i.e. 56 different foods, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc. which in Hinduism are offered to the deity) were served to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also presented the chhappan bhog bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal was accompanying him.
 At the presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo president Satoru Iwata showed the design of the controller of the new Nintendo Revolution console.
 Similar to a television remote control, the controller uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 With this, players will be able to control actions and movements in the videogame by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car and ended the race soon after the start.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, was the leader for most of the race, but his race ended shortly after his pit stop, probably because of a misplaced front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher finished his race shortly after Alonso, because of the damage to the suspension in the numerous battles during the race.
 "She's very cute and sings very well," he said, according to a transcript of the news conference.
 "I felt a great commotion every time we did a rehearsal about it, from the bottom of my heart."
 About 3 minutes after launch, an onboard camera showed several pieces of insulation foam breaking away from the fuel tank.
 However, they are not blamed for causing damage to the space shuttle.
 The commander of the NASA space shuttle sector, N. Wayne Hale Jr., said that the foam had come down "after the moment that really worries us."
 Five minutes later, a wind starts blowing, about a minute later, the wind is coming to 70km/h... then comes the rain, but so strong and so big that it hits your skin like a needle and hail falls from the sky, people in panic and screaming and running over each other.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two people in wheelchairs, people jumping and pushing them," said Armand Versace.
 NHK also said the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no effects from the quake and said reactors 1 and 2 at its nuclear power plant in Shika were shut down.
 It was reported that about 9,400 homes in the region are without water and about 100 homes without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, the rail service was suspended in the affected areas and Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the office of the governor general.
 Three more bombs exploded near government buildings in a two-hour period.
 Some reports say the official death toll was eight, and others confirm that up to 30 were injured; but the final numbers are still unknown.
 Both cyanuric acid and melanin were found in urine samples from pets that died after eating the contaminated food.
 The two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block kidney function, the university researchers said.
 The researchers found that crystals formed in the cat's urine when melanin and cyanuric acid were added.
 The composition of such crystals corresponds to the compound found in the urine of pets that have been hit, when these two compositions are compared using Fourier transform infrared (FTIR).
 I don't know if you notice this or not, but a large part of the merchandise from Central America comes into this country without paying taxes.
 Still, 80 percent of our products were taxed with tariffs in Central American countries. We treated you.
 That didn't seem to make sense to me; it certainly wasn't fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger has signed a bill that bans the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a label that reads "18" and makes their sale to a minor punishable by a fine of $ 1,000 per violation.
 The Director of Public Prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning announcing the charges against Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the Cabinet by Ed Davey MP. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the role of Minister of State for Business, Energy and Industrial Strategy that Davey is vacating.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The fatalities are Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was wounded in the arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider needed reconstructive surgery on his face.
 Uka's gun failed as it pointed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has ongoing pain, blindness in one eye, a missing section of skull and a reconstructed face in titanium.
 Schneider testified via videoconference from a USAF base in his home state.
 In addition to Wednesday's event, Carpanedo competed in two individual races at the Championships.
 His first was the Slalom, where he received a "Did Not Finish" in his first race. 36 out of 116 competitors got the same result in the race.
 Her other race, the Giant Slalom, obtained the tenth position in the group of women sitting with a combined result of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 slower than the first placed Australian Claudia Loesch and 1:09.02 minutes slower than the ninth placed Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani.
 Four female skiers in the women's group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to qualify for the race.
 The Madhya Pradesh Police recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D K Arya said: "We have arrested five people who raped the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The accused were named as Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The accused appeared in court with his face covered, said police superintendent Chandra Shekhar Solanki.
 Although three people were inside the house when it was hit by the car, none of them was injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services freed the driver of the red Audi TT.
 Initially, he was hospitalized at the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was later transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has been in the custody of the Edinburgh Sheriff Court since then, charged with the murder of her son.
 She is in custody while awaiting indictment and trial, but any eyewitness evidence may be compromised because her image has been widely disseminated.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scotland's justice system operates differently, and courts consider publication of photos as potentially damaging.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson, of the University of Dundee, notes that "journalists seem to go in a dangerous direction when they publish photos, videos, etc. of suspects."
 The Crown Office, which is in charge of the overall prosecution, has told journalists that no further comment will be made, at least until indictments are made.
 The document, according to the leak, will refer to the dispute of borders, which Palestine wants based on the borders before the Six-Day War in 1967.
 Other issues covered include the future status of Jerusalem, which is holy to both countries, and the question of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a continuous military presence in the valley for ten years after a deal is signed, while the PA agrees to leave that presence for only five years.
 The shooters in the supplemental pest control test were under close supervision of the forest engineers while the test was monitored and its effectiveness evaluated.
 In a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, qualified volunteers were recruited, in accordance with the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, Acting Director of Conservation and Heritage of NPWS, the four shooters selected for the first hunting operation received comprehensive safety instructions and training.
 Yesterday, Martelly promised a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) of nine members.
 It is the fifth CEP of Martelly in four years.
 Last month, a presidential commission recommended the resignation of the CEP as part of a package of measures to move the country towards new elections.
 The commission was the response given by Martelly to the general protests organized against the regime. The demonstrations began in October.
 The occasional violent protests were sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which had been scheduled since 2011.
 About 60 cases of iPods with overheating problems were reported, causing a total of six fires and leaving four people with minor burns.
 Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 accidents related to the devices.
 Last week, METI disclosed that Apple had informed it of 34 more overheating incidents, which the company classified as "non-serious."
 The ministry responded by calling the Apple report's delay "truly regrettable."
 The earthquake hit Mariana at 07h19 local time. In GMT time, it was on Friday, at 21h19.
 The office of emergency management of the Northern Marianas said there were no reported damage in the country.
 In addition, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center said there was no indication of a tsunami.
 A former Filipino policeman hijacked a bus of tourists in Manila, capital of the Philippines, and held them hostage in Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza fired his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued and at least six have been confirmed dead so far.
 Six hostages, including children and elderly people, were freed earlier, as well as the Filipino photographers.
 Then, photographers took the place of an elderly lady who needed to go to the toilet. Mendoza was shot dead.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and entered a career in medicine.
 He trained as an obstetrician and began working at Auckland's National Women's Hospital in 1959.
 Although he was working in the hospital, Liggins began to investigate premature births in his spare time.
 His research showed that if a hormone were administered, it would accelerate the fetal lung maturation of the baby.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators recovered two "black boxes," flight data recorders, on Wednesday.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said that "Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme. My first businesswoman. Luna died on a night with two moons. Something exceptional, just like her. Strong woman".
 Dustin Goldust Runnels said: "Luna was as crazy as me... or maybe even more... I loved her and will miss her... I hope she is in a better place."
 Among the 1,400 people surveyed before the 2010 federal elections, the percentage of those opposed to changing Australia into a republic has grown by 8% since 2008.
 Acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard stated during the 2010 election campaign that she believed Australia would become a republic at the end of Queen Elizabeth II's reign.
 34 percent of those surveyed share this view, wishing that Queen Elizabeth II be the last monarch of Australia.
 At the extremes of the survey, 29% of respondents believe Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while 31% believe Australia should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medalist was supposed to swim in the 100 and 200 freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but due to his complaints, his physical condition was questioned.
 He was unable to take the painkillers he needed to overcome the pain, as these are banned in the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at Central Missouri University, discovered the largest prime number known to date on January 25.
 Several people verified the discovery using different types of hardware and software in early February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 It is possible that comets were a source of water to the earth along with organic matter that can develop proteins and make life possible.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the Earth formed, since comets collided with the Earth long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a law last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He referred to the rumors as "politicking and nonsense"
 He is speculated to run for president in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that the FAA says would let planes fly shorter routes, save millions of gallons of fuel each year and reduce carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite-based technology as opposed to older ground-based radar technology to allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more accurately and provide more accurate information to pilots.
 There will be no extra transport and surface trains will not stop at Wembley. Parking and public transport connections will not be available.
 The problem of lack of transport increased the possibility of the game having to be played behind closed doors, without the presence of the fan.
 On Thursday, the magazine Science published a study where it reports the discovery of a new species of bird in the Galapagos Islands, in Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that this process would take much longer, due to reproduction between an endemic Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and the immigrant cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be worked in any kind of form. It can even be rolled into small shapes.
 It is possible to stretch to form a thin thread, which can be twisted and braided. It can be hammered or wound into sheets.
 It can be very thin and glued to another metal. Because it is so thin, it was sometimes used to decorate hand-painted frames in books called "illuminated manuscripts".
 This is called chemical PH. You can make a marker using red beet juice.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or basic (alkaline) the chemical is.
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) in the chemical tested.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have had their electrons removed (since hydrogen atoms consist of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two powders and, with clean hands, shape them into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which causes a strange sensation and forms a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had a toilet with a flush in almost every house, connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 Remnants of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, Greece.
 Toilets also existed in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In Roman civilization, toilets were sometimes part of public baths, frequented by both men and women.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you are using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then redirects it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and vision.
 It takes a giant rocket more than 30 meters tall to put a satellite or telescope into space.
 The wheel has changed the world in amazing ways. The biggest thing the wheel has done for us is give us a much easier and faster transportation.
 We gave you the train, the car and many other forms of transport.
 Below them are the medium-sized cats that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats (including stray pets) that eat small animals, much more numerous, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The revelation for their success is the concept of niche, a special function that each cat does that prevents them from competing with each other.
 Lions are the most social of the big cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The bands consist of one to three adult males of the same family, along with up to 30 females and cubs.
 Women are usually closely related to each other, being a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides act in a similar way to wolf or dog packs, animals surprisingly similar to lions (but not other big cats) in behaviour, and also very deadly to their prey.
 A well-balanced athlete, the tiger can climb (though not well), swim, jump great distances and pull with five times the strength of a strong human.
 The tiger is in the same group (Genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars. These four felines are the only ones that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is not like the all-out roar of a lion, but more like a phrase of words shouted and snarls.
 Jaguarundis like to eat small animals. They catch monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds if they can. Almost all the animals that the jaguarundi hunts are much smaller than it is.
 Scientists believe that jaguars follow and find their prey by smell, sniffing where they have been on the ground.
 They can see very well in the dark with night vision and also move stealthily. Jaguarundis hunt their prey by blending in with their surroundings and then attacking their prey.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) separates from the main population from which they came (for example, if they cross a mountain range or a river, or go to an island from which they cannot easily return), they often find themselves in an environment different from the one they used to live in.
 This new environment has different resources and new competitors, so the new population will need to acquire different characteristics from those it already has and adapt to become a strong competitor.
 The original population has not changed at all, they still need the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, as the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, it will become less and less like the other population.
 Eventually, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they cannot be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which simply means the formation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale (i.e., breathe out).
 Plants use the sun as their food through photosynthesis. They also provide shade.
 We build our houses using plants and make our clothes using plants. Most of the food we eat is plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The Mosasaur was the alpha predator of its era, so the only thing it feared was other Mosasaurs.
 Its long jaws were lined with more than 70 sharp teeth, along with an extra set in the roof of the mouth, which shows that nothing that crossed its path could escape.
 We are not sure, but it may have had a forked tongue. Its diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs and may even have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked anything that came into the water; even a giant dinosaur like the T-Rex would not stand a chance against him.
 Although most of their food was familiar to us, the Romans still had their share of strange or unusual foods, such as wild boar, peacock, snail, and a type of rodent called a porcupine.
 Another difference was that while the poor and women ate sitting in chairs, the rich men liked to hold banquets together where they lay on their sides while eating.
 Food in ancient Rome did not include foodstuffs originating in America and Asia for Europe, as it did in later centuries.
 For example, they had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cocoa, and no ancient Roman ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians made a primary temple for each of their gods, which were considered the home of their respective god.
 People made sacrifices to the gods, and priests sought to meet the needs of these gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctuary in which only the priests could enter.
 Sometimes special pyramids in the shape of towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the hot climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 Most of Hebrew family life took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the yard, shops were only open counters facing the street, and stones were used in the construction of houses.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely settled. In the Norse sagas, it is said that Erik the Red, exiled from Iceland for murder, sailed west and found Greenland, which he named.
 But, regardless of its discovery, Eskimo tribes already lived there at the time.
 Although all countries were "Scandinavian", there were many differences between the peoples, kings, customs and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, this is not true. Although there is something written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 Written on the back of the Declaration of Independence are the words "Original Declaration of Independence, dated July 4, 1776." The text appears in the lower corner of the document, upside down.
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that, at the beginning of its existence, the great parchment document (it measures 29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was rolled up to be stored.
 Thus, it is likely that a note was simply added as a label.
 The landings and subsequent battles on D-Day liberated northern France, but the south was not yet free.
 It was ruled by the French "Vichy". They were French who made peace with the Germans in 1940 and worked with the invaders instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France, the invasion was called "Operation Dragon".
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces had liberated southern France and were turning toward Germany.
 A civilization is a unique culture shared by a large significant group of people who live and work cooperatively, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state, and which also, in some way, defines the size of the society.
 City-states are the precursors of nations. The culture of civilization derives from the transfer of knowledge by different generations, a lasting cultural reach and a fair dissemination.
 Smaller cultures often fade without leaving adequate historical evidence and are no longer recognized as civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states first formed a weak central government—the Congress being its only component—under the Articles of Confederation.
 Congress lacked the power to demand taxes, and because there was no national executive or judiciary, it relied on state authorities, which generally did not cooperate, to enforce all its laws.
 In addition, there was no authority to repeal tax laws and tariffs between the states.
 The Articles required unanimous consent among all states before they could be amended, and the states gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives were almost never present.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German national team, is the second most successful in the world and was the FIFA World Cup champion in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and F1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern regions, with Italians competing in international games and Olympic events.
 Japan has about 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making Japan the 7th largest island in the world!
 Due to the cluster/group of islands that Japan has, Japan is often referred to, in a geographical position, as an "archipelago"
 Taiwan's foundation dates back to the 15th century, when Europeans sailing through the region named the place Formosa Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in southwestern Taiwan, initiating a transformation in the practices of indigenous grain production and employing Chinese to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing dynasty (1644-1912) forces took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signs the Treaty of Shimonoseki, by which it cedes sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which governs the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists of three main structures, namely the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the grounds have been reconstructed to give tourists a better idea of how they were originally.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was recovered, and this recovery continues to this day.
 As an example, the most common form of still photography on the planet is 35 mm, which was the size of film that had the most circulation at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but the most important thing is that its proportion has been inherited by digital camera image sensor formats.
 The 35mm format is, in fact, confusingly shaped, 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 The screen ratio of this format (dividing by twelve to get the smallest ratio of whole numbers) is therefore 3:2.
 Many common formats (the APS family of formats, for example) are equal to or close to this ratio.
 The much abused and often demoralized law of thirds is a simple guideline that provides a dynamic while maintaining a relative order in a figure.
 According to him, the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds vertical and horizontal (see example) is the most effective place for the main subject.
 During this period of European history, the Catholic Church, which had become rich and powerful, came under scrutiny.
 For more than a thousand years, the Christian religion united the European states, despite the differences in language and customs.
 All were affected by his influencing power, from the king to the peasant.
 One of the main Christian principles is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty and that the monetary funds of the church are there specifically for that reason.
 The central leadership of the church had been in Rome for over a thousand years and this concentration of power and money led many to question whether this principle was being fulfilled.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain began a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy proved effective, cutting off vital supplies to both military and civilians, though this blockade violated generally accepted international regulations and provisions in several international agreements over the past two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent any ship from entering entire areas of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 Germany, since there was limited response to this tactic, expected a similar attack to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 During the 1920s, the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and nations were those of pacifism and isolation.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of war during World War I, nations wanted to avoid such a situation again in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to accept a job at the Edison Company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with no money, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (the head of his previous job) to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique way of demonstrating different eras; each stage of China or each family that was in power was a distinct dynasty.
 In addition, between each dynasty there was an unstable era of divided provinces. The most well-known of these periods was the Three Kingdoms era, which lasted 60 years between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these periods, a fierce war took place between many nobles who fought for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms was one of the bloodiest eras in the history of Ancient China, thousands of people died fighting to sit on the throne of the great palace of Xi'an.
 There are many social and political effects, such as the use of the metric system, a shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people and not to a single ruler.
 Moreover, after the Revolution, vacancies were opened to all male candidates, enabling the most ambitious and successful to succeed.
 The same goes for the military, since instead of the ranks being based on social class, they were now based on character.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed people of the working class in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond the mundane life. He used to frequent a cave which came to be known as "Hira'" on the mountain of "Noor" (light) for contemplation.
 The cave itself, which has survived the ages, gives a very vivid picture of Muhammad's religious inclinations.
 Resting on top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, the cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, it is not easy to find it, even if you know it exists. Once inside the cave, it is total isolation.
 There is nothing to see but the clear blue sky above and the mountains around. Very little of this world can be seen or heard from inside the cave.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the World that still exists today.
 Built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century B.C., the Great Pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor dead pharaohs.
 The Giza Plateau, or the "Necropolis of Giza", in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, has several pyramids (among which the Great Pyramid is the largest), several small tombs, several temples and the great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was created in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built to honor Khufu's wives and family.
 The "upward-pointing bow" mark has its appearance similar with a V, and the "downward-pointing bow" mark has its appearance similar with a clamp or a square without the bottom side.
 Up means you should start at the tip and push the bow; down means you should start at the grip (where you hold the bow) and pull the bow.
 In general, an upward bow produces a softer sound, while a downward bow produces a stronger, more assertive sound.
 You can write your own notes, but don't forget that the printed bow notes exist for a musical reason, so these should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, the terrified King Louis XVI, Queen Marie Antoinette, their two young sons (Maria Theresa, 11, and Louis Charles, 4), and the King's sister, Madame Elizabeth, were forced to return to Paris from Versailles by a mob of women from the markets.
 In a carriage, they traveled back to Paris surrounded by a crowd of people shouting and screaming threats against the king and queen.
 The crowd of people forced the King and Queen to keep their carriage windows wide open.
 At one point, a protester waved the head of a dead royal guard in front of the terrified queen.
 The war expenses of the United States imperialism in the conquest of the Philippines were paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the US colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and interest on bonds with floating rates on behalf of the Philippine government through Wall Street banking houses.
 Of course, the superprofits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the basic gains of American imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context that led to the creation of the order.
 The time when such events occurred is commonly called the High Middle Ages, a period of European history between the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000–1300 AD).
 The High Middle Ages was preceded by the Late Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages, which, by convention, ends around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a number of ideas in practice, from the offer of technology or the technological imperative to a strict notion that human destiny is determined by an underlying logic associated with scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism share 2 general ideas: the first, is that technological development itself follows a path that goes beyond cultural or political influence; the second, is the idea that technology, in turn, has "effects" on societies that are inherent, rather than socially conditioned.
 For example, one might say that the automobile necessarily results in the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for just a few cars, so new methods of production are developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The possession of mass cars leads to a higher incidence of accidents on the roads, which leads to the invention of new techniques in the health system to heal the injured bodies.
 Romanticism had a strong element of cultural determinism, drawn from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 Geography, in the context of Romanticism, made citizens molded and that, over time, customs and culture arose linked to this geography, which, by being in harmony with the place of society, became better than the laws that were eventually obligatory.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the contemporary world, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 Its fame as a luxury center began around 400 AD and lasted until about 1100 AD.
 Its status declined during the 12th century mainly due to the fact that the Crusaders returned bringing gifts such as silks and spices, which were worth more than what the Byzantine markets offered.
 It was at this time that the transfer of the title of Fashion Capital from Constantinople to Paris occurred.
 Gothic language reached its peak in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries and also in the 14th century.
 At first, the clothing was very influenced by the Byzantine culture in the eastern region.
 However, due to slow communication channels, styles in the west may lag behind by 25 to 30 years.
 By the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest advances for the time was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to close their garments.
 Subsistence agriculture is agriculture carried out for the production of food sufficient to satisfy only the needs of the farmers and their families.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, usually organic system that uses native seed stocks from the ecoregion, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize production.
 Historically, most farmers have been involved in subsistence agriculture, and this is still the case in most developing nations.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded individuals who feel neglected by mainstream society and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures may be distinct due to age, ethnicity, class, location, and/or gender of the members.
 The qualities that determine a subculture as distinct may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their affiliation through distinctive and symbolic use of style, which includes fashions, mannerisms, and jargon.
 One of the most common methods used to illustrate the importance of socialization is to refer to the few unfortunate cases of children who were, through neglect, misfortune, or intentional abuse, not socialized by adults while they were growing up.
 These children are called "ferocious" or wild. Some of these children were confined by people (usually by their own parents); in some cases, the abandonment of this child was due to the rejection of the child by the parents because of his or her severe intellectual or physical disability.
 Children who are rebellious may have suffered serious trauma or abuse in childhood, before being abandoned or running away from home.
 Others are supposed to have been created by animals; some are said to have lived in the jungle by themselves.
 When fully raised by animals, the wild child displays behaviors (within physical limits) almost entirely similar to those of the particular pet animal, such as its fear or indifference to humans.
 While project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, the scaffolding method goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but rather a help for students who are going through a new learning experience, such as using a new computer or starting a new project.
 Scaffolds can be virtual or physical, in other words, a teacher can be considered a scaffold, as well as that little talking clip of Microsoft Office.
 The virtual scaffolds are internalized in the software with the aim of questioning, alerting and explaining procedures that may be challenging for the student to handle alone.
 Children are placed in foster homes for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should grow up in an environment that does not nurture, care for and educate, but it happens.
 We see the Family Hosting System as a safe zone for these children.
 Our adoption platform has a duty to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, regular education and guaranteed medical care.
 It is assumed that foster care meets all the needs that were lacking in the home from which they were taken.
 The internet combines elements of both interpersonal and mass communication.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of approaches to uses and gratifications.
 For example, "learning" and "socializing" are indicated as important motivations for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 “Personal involvement” and “relationships with continuity” were also identified as new motivational characteristics by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied the public’s reactions to web pages.
 The use of video recording has led to important discoveries in the interpretation of microexpressions, facial movements that last a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that a person can detect if another person is lying by correctly interpreting microexpressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President's Speech, indicated how people who are unable to understand speech because of brain damage are, despite this, able to accurately assess sincerity.
 He even suggests that such skills of interpreting human behavior may be shared by animals such as domestic dogs.
 Twentieth-century research has concluded that there are two ways of genetic variation: secret and manifest.
 The mutation adds a new genetic variation and selection removes it from the pool of expressed variation.
 Segregation and recombination mixes variation between the two bases with each generation.
 In the savannah, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system like that of humans, consuming the available plant resources, to meet its amino acid requirements.
 In addition, not acting accordingly has serious consequences: severe depression, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The most readily available plant-based resources would be the proteins in leaves and legumes, but they are difficult for us, primates, to digest unless they are cooked.
 However, foods of animal origin (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easily digestible, but also provide proteins in large quantities that contain all essential amino acids.
 Taking all this into account, it would not be surprising if our own ancestors had solved their "protein problems" more or less as the savannah chimpanzees do today.
 Sleep interruption is a process that consists of waking up intentionally during the normal period of sleep and falling asleep soon after (10–60 minutes).
 This can be easily done by using a quiet alarm clock to bring him to consciousness without waking him up completely.
 If you find yourself resetting the clock while you sleep, it can be placed on the other side of the room, forcing you to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other possibilities based on the biorhythm include drinking plenty of liquid (especially water or tea, a known diuretic) before bed, as this forces the person to get up to urinate.
 The level of inner peace of a person correlates inversely to his level of bodily and spiritual tension.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the vital force present. Every person has the potential to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can achieve enlightenment. The only thing that hinders this goal is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded by the Mahayana path of love and many techniques of Indian Yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the path of all-embracing love.
 With Kundalini Yoga, the kundalini energy (illuminating energy) is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The central part of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga. Through the visualization of various deities, the energy channels are cleared, the chakras are activated and the awareness of enlightenment is created.
 Germany was a common villain in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. With the end of the war, system shocks, processes and cultures led to the disintegration of countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former allies were now enemies, and the Cold War began.
 The goal was to last for the next 40 years and, in fact, there would be leadership of replacement troops on the battlefields of Africa to Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places.
 On 17 September 1939, the Polish defence was already destroyed and the only way out was to retreat and regroup along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans became obsolete almost overnight when more than 800,000 soldiers of the Soviet Red Army created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the eastern regions of Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga Peace, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international, bilateral and multilateral treaties.
 The use of ships to transport goods is by far the most efficient means to move people and goods on a large scale across the oceans.
 The work of navies has traditionally been to ensure that their country maintains the ability to move people and goods while, at the same time, interfering with the ability of their enemies to move their own people and goods.
 One of the most notable recent examples of this was the North Atlantic battle of World War II. The Americans were trying to move men and materials across the Atlantic Ocean to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using U-boats in particular, was trying to stop this traffic.
 Had the Allies failed, Germany would likely have had the ability to conquer Britain as it did the rest of Europe.
 It seems that goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began keeping them in order to facilitate access to milk, hair, meat and hides.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that grazed on hillsides or other grazing areas, often tended by shepherds who were often children or teenagers, similar to the more familiar sheep herder. These methods of herding are still used today.
 Wagonways were built in England from the 16th century.
 Although the wagons consisted only of parallel wooden planks, this allowed the horses to pull them to achieve higher speeds and carry larger loads on the slightly more accident-prone roads.
 Sleepers were implemented right at the beginning, to keep the rails in place. Gradually, however, it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they had a metal cover on top.
 This became a common practice, but the iron caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first fully iron rails were introduced.
 The first known means of transportation was walking. Humans began walking upright two million years ago, with the emergence of Homo erectus (which means "upright man").
 His predecessor, Australopithecus, did not walk upright as usual.
 Bipedal adaptations are found in Australopithecus fossils dating between 4.2 and 3.9 million years ago, but Sahelanthropus may have been walking upright on two legs much earlier, seven million years ago.
 We can begin to live in a more environmentally friendly way, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even be activists to reduce future suffering to some degree.
 This is exactly how symptomatic treatment is in many cases. However, if we do not want to have only a temporary solution, we must find the origin of the problems and end them.
 It is obvious enough that the world has changed a lot because of the scientific and technological advances of the human race, and problems have become greater because of the overpopulation and extravagant lifestyle of man.
 After adoption by Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to a printing shop owned by John Dunlap.
 During the night, about 150 to 200 copies were made, now known as "Dunlap attacks".
 The first public reading of the document was made by John Nixon, in the Independence Hall courtyard on July 8.
 On July 6, one was sent to George Washington, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that still exist are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original hand-written copy has not survived.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and is alive today. We call them birds.
 Many people don't think of them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many similarities between birds and dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet and claws, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs, like a T-rex.
 Almost all computers used today are based on manipulation of information that is encoded in the form of binary numbers.
 A binary number can have only one of two values, that is, 0 or 1, and these numbers are classified as binary digits - or bits, using the language used in computing.
 Internal poisoning may not be apparent immediately. Symptoms, such as vomiting, are so general that a diagnosis cannot be made immediately.
 The biggest clue to internal poisoning may be the presence of an open container of medication or household toxic chemicals.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions related to that particular poison.
 The term "insects" is used by entomologists in a formal sense to refer to this group of insects.
 This term derives from the old familiarity with bedbugs, which are very structured insects to stick to humans.
 Both barbers and bedbugs are nesting, adapted to live in nests or shelters of their hosts.
 In the United States, there are about 400,000 known cases of Multiple Sclerosis (MS), making it the leading neurological disease in young adults and adults.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 The research has shown that women have twice the chances of having multiple sclerosis than men.
 A couple may decide that having a baby is not in their best interest, or in the best interest of their child.
 Such couples are allowed to decide to make a plan to adopt the baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents relinquish their parental rights so that another couple can care for the child.
 The main goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method. It is this method that guides scientific research.
 It is not, in fact, only experimentation; an experiment is a test used to eliminate one of the possible hypotheses or more, ask questions. Making observations also guides a scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on classical texts and, in particular, the Latin Bible.
 All of Aristotle's scientific thoughts were accepted, including psychology.
 As knowledge of Greek receded, the West found itself distant from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many rhythms observed in physiology and behavior are fundamentally dependent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not absolutely responses to external periodic stimuli, have been found for most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that will continue to function for a period of continuous cycle, even without the interference of the environment.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the main indicators that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase use phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into the bacteria.
 They did two experiments that either marked the phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus or the phage protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a variety of different effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the piece of genetic material affected, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while mutations in other parts can cause cell death or cancer.
 Natural tourism attracts people interested in visiting areas of nature with the aim of enjoying the scenery, including fauna and flora.
 Examples of local activities include fishing, taking photographs, bird watching, visiting parks, and studying the ecosystem.
 One example is to visit, photograph and learn about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, by car, people leave the small towns of the interior, to go to work in other cities, and come across other people who work just in those small towns from which they left.
 In this dynamic transport bus, everyone is somehow connected and supporting a system of transport based on private cars.
 Science now points out that this carbon-based economy has shifted the biosphere from the stable state that had allowed human evolution over the past two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transportation systems. Almost everyone also complains about these transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear similar levels of complaints about water quality or falling bridges.
 Why do transportation systems generate so many complaints, why do they fail daily? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent, or is something more fundamental going on?
 Traffic Flow is the analysis of the movement of drivers and individual vehicles between two different points and the interactions they make with each other.
 Unfortunately, studying traffic flow is difficult because driver behavior cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a relatively consistent range; thus, traffic flows tend to have some reasonable consistency and can be represented mathematically.
 To better represent traffic flow, relationships were established between the three main characteristics: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 Such relationships assist in the planning, design and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to go airborne. Their ability to fly helped them escape enemies more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings along their body.
 This gives them a greater range of small places to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings back are dragonflies and mayflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the Solar System moved around the Sun.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite; that the Solar System moved around the Earth, including the Sun (and even the other stars).
 That sounds sensible, because the planet Earth doesn't seem to be moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the largest river and the second longest on Earth. It carries more than eight times as much water as the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on Earth, sometimes with nearly 10 km of width.
 A total of 20% of the water that goes from the rivers of the planet to the oceans comes from the Amazon.
 The main Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 miles) long. It receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size and technical excellence of construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Empire marveled at the constructions of their predecessors, which were up to then much older than a thousand years.
 The population of Vatican City is about 800 people. It is the smallest independent country in the world, and with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian in its legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also the common language used by most who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholics.
 Since ancient times, people have known basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper because they can all be found in nature in their natural form and are relatively simple to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that everything is a mixture of one or more of four elements, which are earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was more related to the four states of matter (in the same order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, although he also theorized that they transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are simply a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course, there are also metals like silver and gold.
 You can also make alloys that include small amounts of nonmetallic elements, such as carbon.
 All things in the Universe are made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so amazingly small that it would be possible for trillions of them to fit into the period at the end of this sentence.
 Therefore, the pencil was a good friend to many people when it was launched.
 Unfortunately, as new writing methods appeared, the pencil was relegated to a less important role and use.
 Nowadays, people write messages through computer screens and do not need to get close to a pointer.
 We can only imagine what the keyboard will become when something newer comes along.
 The fission bomb works on the principle that energy is needed to build a nucleus with several protons and neutrons.
 It's more or less like walking with a heavy cart up a hill. The division of the nucleus again releases some of this energy.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to split apart with little or no encouragement.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rocks and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The crust is 70 km thick on the visible side and 100 km thick on the invisible side.
 The layer is thinner under the seas and thicker under the mountains.
 There may be more magma on the nearest side because the crust is thinner. It was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on finding what motivates people or what attracts them.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and/or desires that have been internalized as they reach adulthood.
 These theories look at what is in certain people that makes them want to do what they do and what things in their environment will make them do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs Theory and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 In general, two conducts may surface as managers begin to lead their former co-workers. One side of the spectrum tries to remain as "one of the guys" (or girls).
 This type of manager has difficulty making unpopular decisions, adopting disciplinary measures, making performance evaluations, delegating and holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, the person becomes an unrecognizable individual who feels that he must change everything that the team has done and do his own thing.
 After all, the leader is responsible for the success and failure of a team.
 This behavior often ends in conflicts between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams have to maintain the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, however, there are some subtle differences.
 Virtual team members usually act as the point of contact for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than conventional team members, as their teams may be located in different time zones, which may not be understood by local management.
 The presence of a true “invisible team” (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p.109) is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the management team to whom each member reports. The invisible team sets the standards for each member.
 Why would an organization want to go through the difficult process of establishing organizational learning? One of the practical goals of organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively used by all functional departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity shine through.
 As a result, the process of a team working to overcome a difficulty may lead to a new innovative process that meets the customer's need.
 Before an organization can be innovative, leaders need to create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) clarifies the Continuum approach as a methodology used to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data offer physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition, therefore narrowing the research area and making it much more accurate.
 The correlation between brain and behavioral pathology underpins scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The emergence of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes never seen before.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to design simulation models that help us understand the processes that exist in our mind.
 Although AI has a strong science fiction connotation, AI is a very important branch of computer science, addressing intelligent behavior, learning and adaptation in a machine.
 AI research involves the production of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent activity.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to address customer issues and diagnoses, as well as the recognition of writing, voice and speech.
 These things have become separate disciplines, which focus on providing solutions to real-life problems.
 AI is often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, as it is integrated into various software applications of home computers and video games.
 Field trips are very important for any school class. Often, teachers would love to take their students to places that are not an option for a bus trip.
 Technology offers the solution with virtual field trips. From the classroom, students can see pieces of museums, visit an aquarium or admire beautiful works of art.
 Sharing a field trip virtually is also a great way to reflect on a field trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year, students at Bennet School in North Carolina develop a website about their trip to the state capital. Each year, the site is redesigned, but the old versions are kept online to serve as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help in improving the writing of students. Since students often start their blogging experience with poor grammar and spelling, the presence of a general audience usually changes that.
 As students are often the most critical audience, the blog author begins to strive to improve writing and avoid criticism.
 In addition, having a blog "forces students to become more knowledgeable about the world around them." The need to feed the public's interest inspires students to be smart and interesting (Toto, 2004).
 Writing blogs is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to extend learning far beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of blogs "can make students more analytical and critical; interacting with the contents of the Internet in an active way, students can position themselves in the context of the writings of others, as well as define their own perspectives on specific issues (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the charming and bilingual capital of Canada and boasts a number of art galleries and museums that demonstrate the Canadian past and present.
 Niagara Falls are further south; the north has the unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and more.
 Because of all this and more, Ontario stands out as what people from outside consider to be the essence of Canada.
 Large areas further north are also sparsely populated and some are virtually uninhabited.
 For comparison of the population that surprises many people: there are more African Americans living in the US than Canadian citizens.
 The East African Islands are in the Indian Ocean, a distance from the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest, and a continent by itself, when it comes to wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent nations, or associated with France, and are known as luxury beach hotels.
 The Arabs also brought to the lands Islam, which gained a lot of popularity in Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama found the Cape Route from Europe to India.
 In the north, the region is bounded by the Sahel, and in the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Women: It is recommended that all female travelers say they are married, regardless of their current marital status.
 It is also useful to use a ring (but not one that looks too expensive).
 Women should understand that cultural differences may cause acts that they would consider harassment, and it is not uncommon to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in refusing men. Don't be afraid to stand your ground (whether it's cultural differences or not, it doesn't mean it's okay!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century B.C., and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinids as a strategic port called Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed and rebuilt it with the name of Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in 1755.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya, which received the name of Casablanca by the Spanish merchants who established trading bases there.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop in Morocco as a whole.
 Near the historic part of Medina it is easy to find traditional Moroccan goods, such as tagines, ceramics, leather goods, hookahs and a lot of trinkets, all for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, in the far east, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried a large part of the city's streets, mainly the center.
 Although Goma is reasonably safe, any visit outside of Goma should be studied to understand the state of the battle that persists in the province of Nord-Kivu.
 The city is also the base for scaling the Nyiragongo volcano, along with some of the cheapest gorilla trekking in Africa.
 You can use a boda-boda (motorcycle taxi) to tour Goma. The normal (local) price is about 500 Congolese francs for a quick ride.
 "Timbuktu" came to be used as a metaphor for distant and exotic lands, given its relative inaccessibility.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor city despite its reputation for making it a tourist attraction, and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was placed on the list of humanity's heritage in danger, due to the danger of the desert sands.
 It was one of the main stops during the Wonders of the African World program by Henry Louis Gates, broadcast on the PBS channel.
 The city contrasts strongly with the rest of the country because it has a more Arabic than African touch.
 Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa, along the border of Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the north, and the Crocodile River on the southern border.
 The park covers 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different ecological zones, each sustaining different animal species.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered the flagship of South African National Parks (SANParks).
 There are entrance and conservation fees for the park, as is the case with all South African national parks.
 It can also be very useful to buy a Wild Card. With it you can have access to several parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 The island of Hong Kong gives its name to the territory of Hong Kong and is the place that many tourists consider as their main attraction.
 The parade of buildings that form the skyline of Hong Kong has been compared to a glowing bar graph that is visible by the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best views of Hong Kong, get off the island and head to the waterfront in Kowloon, on the opposite side.
 Most of the urban development of Hong Kong Island is densely concentrated in reclaimed land along the north shore.
 This is the place that the British colonizers chose to live, and so if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of the territory, this is a great place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest mangrove forest in the world, extending 80 km (50 mi) inland from the coast of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans was declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. The part of the forest within Indian territory is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 But forests are not only home to mangrove swamps - they have some of the last great jungles that once covered the remaining Gangetic plains.
 The Sundarbans covers an area of 3,850 km², one third of which is covered by water/swamp.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are currently 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 There are several bus departure times from the inter-district bus station (across the river) during the day, but most, especially those going east and Jakar/Bumthang, leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As the inter-district buses are almost always crowded, it is advisable to buy the ticket a few days in advance.
 Most districts are served by Japanese coastal buses, which are comfortable and durable.
 Shared taxis are a quick and comfortable way to travel to nearby places, such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oiapoque Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge. It crosses the Oiapoque River to link the cities of Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint-Georges-de-l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 meters, have 378 meters in length and two tracks of 3.50 m wide.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 2011 and did not open to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to enter into operation in September 2017, the date scheduled for the completion of customs inspections in Brazil.
 The Guarani were the most significant indigenous group inhabiting what is now eastern Paraguay, living as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other groups of indigenous tribes, such as the Guaicurus and the Paiaguás, who lived off hunting, gathering and fishing.
 In the 16th century, Paraguay, formerly called "The Giant Province of the Indies", emerged from the encounter between Spanish conquerors and indigenous native groups.
 The Spanish began the period of colonization that lasted three centuries.
 Since the creation of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has succeeded in maintaining many of its characteristics and identity of the indigenous peoples.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The biggest tournament of the year takes place in December on the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 Tournaments and minor matches can also be seen here at other times of the year.
 To find out about tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches, see the Argentine Polo Association.
 The official currency of Falklands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), which is equivalent to one British pound (GBP).
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the islands, which is located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West shop.
 The pound sterling is generally accepted anywhere in the islands and in Stanley credit cards and US dollars are accepted.
 In remote islands, credit cards are unlikely to be accepted, although British and American currency may be accepted. Please inform the owners in advance to know which payment method they accept.
 It is virtually impossible to change the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the islands, so exchange your money before leaving the islands.
 As Montevideo is south of the equator, it is summer there, while it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is in the subtropical region; in the summer months, temperatures above 30 °C are common.
 Winter can be disappointingly cold: temperatures rarely fall below freezing, but the wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than the thermometer shows.
 There are no particularly "rainy" and "dry" seasons: the amount of rain remains basically the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to human presence, they are still wild animals that should not be fed or disturbed.
 Following the instructions of the park authorities, keep at least 100 yards/meters from bears and wolves, and 25 yards/meters from all other wild animals!
 Despite their docile appearance, bison, moose, and bears, as well as all large animals, can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they didn't keep a proper distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so don't get too close.
 Also, know that odors attract bears and other wild animals, however, avoid carrying or cooking food with strong smell and keep the camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The city is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the scene of a well-known naval impasse in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Great Britain refused to leave it.
 All the ships were sunk, except for one British cruiser. Nearly 200 lives of Germans and Americans were lost.
 During the Mau independence struggle, a peaceful meeting in the town resulted in the assassination of the paramount chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is between two bays. The most popular are in three areas.
 The beaches on the north coast (in the North Harbour district) are washed by the Pacific Ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 They are almost all sandy beaches with safe swimming, and many have shade from the pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are located in the Waitemata Harbour, in the upscale suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, in the central region of Auckland.
 These are sometimes crowded family beaches with a wide variety of shops around the coast. Swimming is safe.
 The main local beer is 'Number One'. It is not a sophisticated beer, but it is pleasant and refreshing. The other local beer is called "Manta".
 There are many French wines to enjoy, but New Zealand and Australian wines can go down better.
 Local tap water is totally safe to drink, but it is easy to find bottled water if you are worried.
 For Australians, the concept of a flat white coffee is strange: a short black coffee is an "espresso", a cappuccino comes full of cream (not foam) and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is in accordance with Belgian standards. Natural juices are expensive, but great.
 Many trips to the reef are made throughout the year, and injuries from any of these causes, occurring on the reef, are rare.
 Keep heeding the authorities' reminders, obeying all the signs and paying close attention to safety warnings.
 The box jellyfish occurs near beaches and river estuaries from October to April, north of 1770. They can occasionally be found in other periods.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most are afraid of humans and tend to swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not actively live in the ocean. Their main habitat is the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 Booking in advance gives the traveler the peace of mind that he will have a place to sleep when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agents usually do business with specific hotels, although it is likely that it is possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping parks, through a travel agent.
 Travel agents often offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even packages combined with flights and hotels.
 They can also guarantee your reservation if you need time to think about the offer or gather other documents for your destination (e.g., visa).
 However, if there is any change or request, it must first be sent to the travel agent, and not directly to the hotel.
 At some festivals, the vast majority of music festival attendees decide to camp on site, and most of them consider it a key part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you’ll have to get there early to be able to camp near the music.
 Remember that even after the music on the main stages has ended, some sections of the festival may continue playing late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the Baltic Sea in winter, check the location of the cabin, because when crossing the ice is generated a terrible noise for the most sensitive.
 St. Petersburg cruises include city tours. Passengers are exempt from visa requirements (see terms).
 Casinos usually make many efforts to maximize the time and money spent by their visitors. In general there are no windows or clocks, and exits can be difficult to find.
 They usually have special food, drink and entertainment offers to keep the guests in good spirits and to keep them on the premises.
 Some venues offer alcoholic beverages for free. However, drunkenness impairs judgment, and all good gamblers know the importance of keeping sober.
 Whenever someone is driving in places with high latitudes or on roads over the mountains, he should take into account the possibility of facing snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On roads with ice and snow, friction is low, and you can't drive as if you were on clean asphalt.
 During snowstorms, it is possible to fall enough snow to leave you trapped in very little time.
 Visibility can also be reduced by falling snow or wind, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.
 On the other hand, ice and snow conditions are normal in many countries, and traffic remains almost uninterrupted throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the eye candy of many visitors.
 The term "safari", in its colloquial use, refers to land-based trips to observe the impressive African wildlife, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, have a tendency to approach cars, and the basic equipment allows for good viewing.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy, and you will see them better with binoculars.
 Also known as "walking safari", "walking safari" or "passada", a walking safari is equivalent to walking, whether for a few hours or many days.
 The Paralympics will take place between August 24 and September 5, 2021. Some events will be held in other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only city in Asia to have hosted two Summer Olympics, having hosted the games in 1964.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you may have a complicated situation.
 Cancellation policies vary, but by the end of March most cancellation policies because of the coronavirus did not extend until July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled.
 Most tickets for the events are expected to cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen, with regular tickets costing around 7,000 yen.
 Hanging wet clothes can help dry them. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board for loan, even if there is none in the room.
 If an iron is not available, or if you do not like to use pasted-on stockings, you can try using a hair dryer, if available.
 Be careful not to let the fabric heat up too much (which can cause it to shrink or, in more serious cases, cause burns).
 There are different ways to purify water, some more efficient against specific threats.
 In some areas, boiling water for one minute is enough; in others, many minutes are needed.
 The quality of filters varies and if you are in doubt, it may be good to consider the possibility of buying gallons of water from a trusted company.
 Travellers may encounter pests with which they are not familiar in the regions from which they come.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, at worst, cause allergic reactions, spread poison or transmit infections.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill people through force, do not usually qualify as pests.
 Duty free shopping is the chance to buy goods free of taxes and fees in certain places.
 Travelers visiting countries with high taxes can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on products such as alcohol and tobacco.
 The stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont presents the most challenging conditions for drivers on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, which often pass through isolated wilderness areas.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, use your judgement: steep slopes, narrow tracks and sharp bends are common.
 The posted speed limits are visibly lower than in the previous and subsequent sections - commonly 55-65 km/h - and strict adherence to them is even more important than the opposite.
 Interestingly, however, cell phone service is much stronger here than along many other stretches of the route, such as in Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German sweets are very good and, in Bavaria, are very elaborate and varied, similar to those of the neighboring south, Austria.
 Fruit desserts are recurrent, with apples baked in desserts all year round, and cherries and plums making an appearance during the summer.
 Many German bakery goods also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. The famous cakes often go very well with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want some small, but tasty sweets, try what, depending on the region, may be called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 A curry is a dish made of herbs and spices, together with meat or vegetables.
 A curry can be "dry" or "wet" depending on the amount of liquid.
 In the northern interior regions of India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries; in the southern India and other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 With 17,000 islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a smorgasbord that encompasses a wide variety of regional cooking found throughout the country.
 But if used without other qualifiers, the term tends to mean that the food originally is from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, Javanese cuisine includes a variety of simply spiced dishes, the predominant Javanese condiments being peanuts, chilies, sugar (mostly Javanese coconut sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 In order for a rider's feet to have support, stirrups are used, which hang on both sides of the saddle.
 They provide greater stability for the rider, but can present safety issues as the rider's feet can get caught in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but has one foot caught in the stirrup, he may be dragged if the animal runs away. To reduce this danger, several safety precautions can be taken.
 First, a large part of the riders wears riding boots with heel and flat sole, which is quite narrow.
 Then some saddles, especially English saddles, have safety bars that allow a leather stirrup to fall from the saddle if pulled back by a falling rider.
 Being the main climbing destination in Chile, the Cochamó Valley is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a variety of large granite walls and cliffs.
 The meetings include exciting views of the peaks. Alpinists from all over the world are continuously establishing new routes among their infinite potential of walls.
 Snow sports, which include skiing and snowboarding, are popular sports that involve sliding down snow-covered terrain with skis or a snowboard strapped to your feet.
 Skiing is an important activity on the trip for many enthusiasts, occasionally known as "ski bums", who plan entire vacations just to ski at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old—paintings depicting skiers date back to 5000 B.C.!
 Alpine skiing as a sport dates back to the 17th century at the earliest, and in 1861 the first recreational ski team was opened by citizens of Norway in Australia.
 Ski backpack: activity also known as sertão skiing, touring skiing or ski-alpinism.
 It is related, but usually does not involve tourism for alpine skiing or mountaineering, the latter done on steep terrain and requiring much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions, you will be able to cover distances a little longer than on foot - but only very rarely will you be able to achieve the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack on prepared slopes.
 Europe is a relatively small continent but with many independent countries, and in normal circumstances, travelling through several countries would mean having to go through visa applications and passport control several times.
 The Schengen zone, however, works as one country in this regard.
 If you stay in this area, it is possible to cross the border without going through passport control again.
 Similarly, having a Schengen visa, you will not need to apply for visas for each of the Schengen member countries separately, thus saving time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition that specifies which manufactured items are antiques. Some tax agencies define that items over 100 years old are antiques.
 The definition has geographical variations, where the age limit may be lower in places like North America than in Europe.
 Handmade products can be defined as antiques, although they are younger than similar mass-produced products.
 Reindeer herding is an important livelihood among the Sámi, and the culture surrounding the trade is important to many other classes of professionals as well.
 Even though it is a tradition, not all Sami participated in the creation of reindeer on a large scale, but lived from fishing, hunting and things like that, having reindeer as, mainly, draft animals.
 Today, many Sámi work with modern businesses. Tourism is an important income in Sápmi, the Sámi area.
 Although widely used, especially among non-Rom, the term "gypsy" is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of the Romani people.
 If the country you are visiting is subject to travel advisories, your travel health insurance or your travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 It is also recommended that you consult other governments besides your own, but their advice is made for their respective citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may face different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 Councils are only a brief summary of the political situation in a nation.
 The views presented are usually superficial, general and simplified in relation to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Bad weather is the generic term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of human life.
 Bad weather can occur anywhere in the world and encompasses different types, which vary according to geographical location, topography and weather conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of a harsh climate, as well as storms, tornadoes, water spouts and cyclones.
 Severe regional and seasonal weather phenomena include snowstorms, as well as snow, ice and dust storms.
 Travelers are strongly advised to be aware of any risk of bad weather in their region, as this can affect travel plans.
 When planning a visit to a country that is considered a war zone, the person must first receive professional training.
 A search on the Internet for 'Hostile environment course' will usually indicate the address of a company in the area.
 A course will normally cover all the topics discussed here in much more detail, usually with hands-on experience.
 A course usually lasts between 2 and 5 days and involves dramatization, various first aid and, sometimes, training with weapons.
 Books and magazines dealing with survival in the jungle are common, but publications about war zones are rare.
 Travelers planning to have sex reassignment surgery abroad should ensure that they are carrying valid documents for their return trip.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports with gender-neutral (X) or updated documents to find a desired name and gender varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents is widely variable.
 Searches at security checkpoints also became much more intrusive after September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people who have not yet had gender reassignment surgery should not expect to pass through scanners with their privacy and dignity intact.
 Rip currents are the backwash of the water from the waves on the beach back into the sea, usually in a reef or similar area.
 Due to the subaquatic topography, the return flow is concentrated in some deeper sections, and a rapid current can form for deep water there.
 Most deaths are the result of fatigue from trying to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 Once you get out of the current, swimming back is no more difficult than it would be usually.
 Try to aim from somewhere where you can't be caught or, depending on your skills or if you have been detected, wait for rescue.
 The re-entry shock occurs before the cultural shock (it takes less time of honeymoon), lasts longer and can be more serious.
 Travelers who have easily adapted to the new culture sometimes have a special difficulty in readjusting to their native culture.
 When you return home after living abroad, you have adapted to the new culture and lost some of your local culture habits.
 When you went abroad for the first time, people were probably patient and understanding, knowing that travelers in a new country need to adjust.
 People don't realize that patience and understanding are also essential for travelers who are returning home.
 In the children's area, one of the most interesting things is the light and sound show of the pyramid.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and also in silence before the show starts.
 Usually you always hear the sound of tourists and vendors. The story of the sound and light is like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx is defined as the backdrop and narrator of a long history.
 The scenes are displayed on the pyramids and different pyramids are lit up.
 The Shetland Islands, which were discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the largest number of bases, with sixteen active until the year 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula. The largest island is King George Island, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 The others are Livingston Island and Deception, in which the flooded crater of an active volcano provides a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is the southern region of the peninsula, coastal to the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the Peninsula here merge into the plateau, then re-emerge to form the 360 km chain of Ellsworth Mountains, cut by the Minnesota Glacier.
 The northern part, or Sentinel Range, has the highest mountains in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, reaching 4,892 m (16,056 ft) on Mount Vinson.
 In remote locations, without cellular coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 A satellite phone generally does not replace a cell phone, since to make a call you need to be outdoors with a view of the satellite.
 The service is often used for transportation, including recreational vessels, as well as expeditions that have remote data and voice needs.
 Your local telephone company may be able to provide more information about connecting to this service.
 An increasingly popular option for those who want to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 This is especially popular among those leaving school, allowing them to take a year off before university, without compromising their education.
 In most cases, enrolling in a course abroad during a gap year can, in fact, increase your chances of entering higher education in your home country.
 Usually, there will be a registration fee to enroll in these educational programs.
 For those who like boat trips, Finland is a great destination. In the lakes and coastal archipelagos, the "Land of a thousand lakes" also has thousands of islands.
 In the archipelagos and lakes, you don't necessarily need a yacht.
 Although the coastal archipelagos and the largest lakes are really big enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even canoes offer a different experience.
 Boating with a boat is a national pastime in Finland, with a boat for every seven or eight people.
 This is combined by Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but a rather characteristic form (for example, in the Netherlands, the number is one to forty).
 Most Baltic cruises offer an extended stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can visit the historic city for two full days and return to the ship for the night.
 If you only embark on sea excursions, you will not need a separate visa (valid from 2009).
 Some cruises show Berlin, Germany, in the brochures. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can be a frightening experience for people of all ages and backgrounds, especially if these people have never flown before or have never been through a traumatic event.
 It is not something to be ashamed of: it is no different from personal fears and antipathies for other things that many people have.
 For some, understanding something about how aircraft work and what happens during a flight can help overcome fears based on the unknown or a lack of control.
 Transport companies are well paid to deliver things quickly. Often, time is very important in sending commercial documents, goods or spare parts for an urgent repair.
 On some routes, the bigger companies have their own planes, but for other routes and smaller companies, there was a problem.
 If they sent things by air freight, depending on the route, it can take days to get to the port of entry and go through customs.
 The only way to get through faster was to send it as checked baggage. Airline regulations do not allow you to send baggage without a passenger, which is where you come in.
 The obvious way to fly first class or business class is to pay a lot of money for the privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for it).
 However, it is not cheap: as a basic rule, you can expect to pay up to four times more than the normal economy fare for business class and eleven times more for first class!
 In general terms, it is not worth even looking for discounts on seats for business class or first class on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that there is a small group of passengers who are willing to pay a high price for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The language of the country is Romanian, but Russian is widely used.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member country.
 Economic relations have been re-established between these two parts of Moldova, despite the failure of political negotiations.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million people, and has the second largest port after Istanbul, as well as an excellent transportation hub.
 Once the ancient city of Smyrna, now it is a modern, developed and bustling commercial center, located around a large bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The wide avenues, glass-fronted buildings and modern shopping centers are marked by traditional red roofs, the 18th-century market, and the old mosques and churches, although the city has an atmosphere that is more reminiscent of Mediterranean Europe than classical Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvík offers views of the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, there are interesting marble sculptures of doves on tombs of people.
 It is worth walking half an hour through the intriguing village.
 To the north, and easily accessible, is the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became famous among foreigners after an exuberant report of its splendor made by Lord Byron.
 The Scotturb Bus 403 travels to Sintra frequently, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 Also to the north, visit the great Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (Relicário), a place famous worldwide for Marian apparitions.
 Remember that you are basically paying a visit to a huge cemetery, also as a place that has a practically incalculable significance to a significant portion of the world's population.
 There are still many living men and women who survived their period here and many others both Jewish and non-Jewish whose loved ones were murdered or worked to death there.
 Please treat the site with all the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not damage the place by staining or cracking the buildings with graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. Almost half of the people prefer to speak Catalan, most of them understand it, and almost everyone knows Spanish.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, because this is the language that has been established by law as the official language.
 Still, Spanish is widely used in public transportation and other facilities.
 Regular announcements on the metro are made only in Catalan, but unplanned interruptions are announced by an automated system in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is often just an inadequate stereotype, the best way to get along in Paris is still good behavior, acting like someone who is "bien élevé" (well-educated). This will make the trip considerably easier.
 The brusque exterior of the Parisian will quickly disappear if you show some basic courtesies.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is highly forested, mainly with beech, fir, and pine, and features a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 There is a remarkable diversity of plant communities, due to the varied microclimates, different soils and different altitude levels.
 The area also houses a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 Rare animals can be found there, such as European brown bears, wolves, eagles, owls, lynxes, wild cats and tetrazes, as well as several other common species.
 While visiting the monasteries, women are required to wear skirts covering their knees and also need to have their shoulders covered.
 Most monasteries provide robes for women who arrive unprepared, but if you bring your own robes, especially brightly colored ones, you will be greeted with a smile from the monk or nun.
 Similarly, men are required to wear pants covering their knees.
 It is possible to borrow clothes at the entrance; however, they are not washed after each use, so you may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts. For men, there is a single size!
 Majorcan cuisine, like that of similar areas in the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and uses olive oil in everything.
 A simple and popular dinner, especially in summer, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomato and any ingredient at hand, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, along with the word Sie for you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 This also makes reading easier, no doubt, although writing is somewhat complicated by the need to find out whether a verb or adjective is used in the substantivated form.
 Pronunciation is relatively easy in Italian, since most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to be observed are the C and G, as their pronunciation varies according to the following vowel.
 Also, make sure to pronounce r and rr differently: caro means dear, while carro means car.
 The Persian language has a relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and better understand the sentences.
 Needless to say, if you have knowledge of a Romance language, it will be easier to learn Portuguese.
 However, people who speak a little Spanish may hastily conclude that Portuguese is similar enough that it is not necessary to study separately.
 Pre-modern observatories are mostly outdated today and remain in museums or schools.
 As light pollution in their heyday was not a problem, they tend to be found in cities or university campuses, easier to reach than those built more recently.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge installations in remote areas that have favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The observation of cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the plum blossoms were the favorite flower.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom parties were held by the emperor only for himself and other members of the aristocracy around the Imperial Court.
 Plants look better when they are in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even "just one" weed.
 If you visit a formal garden, collecting "specimens" will also get you thrown out, without right to discussion.
 Singapore is generally an extremely safe place and very easy to explore, and you can buy almost anything once you arrive.
 But being in the "high tropics" just a few degrees north of the equator, you'll need to deal with both the heat (constant) and the strong sun (when the sky is clear, more rarely).
 There are also some buses going north to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, Jacob and their wives.
 Check to see if the bus you want to take goes to Hebron, and not just to the nearby settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 The inland waterways can be a good theme around which to organize a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Loire Valley, the Upper Middle Rhine Valley or take a boat trip to the sights of the Danube or sail the Erie Canal.
 They also define routes for popular hiking and cycling trails.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of Christianity and is celebrated as the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the holiday's traditions have been adopted by non-believers in Christian and non-Christian countries around the world.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night awake somewhere open to see the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 Traditional churches often hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend. Congregations often break the service at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that originally arrived on the islands came here by swimming, flying or floating.
 Due to the long distance from the mainland, mammals were unable to make the journey, which made the giant tortoise the main grazing animal on the Galápagos.
 Since the arrival of humans in Galápagos, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This is a great opportunity to see the aurora borealis, as the sky gets darker more or less at the right time.
 As the areas are sparsely populated, and consequently light pollution is not a problem, you will also be able to enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, labor relations are more hierarchical and formal than Westerners are used to seeing.
 Suits are the standard business attire, and co-workers call each other by their last names or titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is crucial, emphasizing group effort rather than enhancing individual achievements.
 Workers generally need the approval of their superiors for all decisions they make, and are expected to obey their superiors' instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.5134304050996057, 'precisions': [0.7660686705477011, 0.5724658608028385, 0.44728118138373446, 0.35426513616925503], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.02143926216577, 'translation_length': 25251, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 73.22278511741908, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8985473566022315, 'scores': [0.8524940609931946, 0.8912817239761353, 0.9079994559288025, 0.8431134223937988, 0.9142028093338013, 0.8269999623298645, 0.9043604135513306, 0.9019325375556946, 0.9070204496383667, 0.9298205971717834, 0.9238930940628052, 0.925359308719635, 0.8980182409286499, 0.8820255398750305, 0.913346529006958, 0.8215182423591614, 0.8945475816726685, 0.9258050322532654, 0.9199884533882141, 0.8793665766716003, 0.9435446262359619, 0.9421703219413757, 0.9415327906608582, 0.9218993186950684, 0.8959068655967712, 0.9488388895988464, 0.8725256323814392, 0.8815001249313354, 0.7793204188346863, 0.9019513130187988, 0.7636708617210388, 0.8650078177452087, 0.8212882876396179, 0.9092188477516174, 0.9445875287055969, 0.9357752203941345, 0.9218499064445496, 0.9309123158454895, 0.9114023447036743, 0.9243566989898682, 0.9064651131629944, 0.9636048674583435, 0.9254665970802307, 0.9159247279167175, 0.892261803150177, 0.8942141532897949, 0.9177297353744507, 0.9265514612197876, 0.9590274095535278, 0.9417835474014282, 0.9372084736824036, 0.9196048378944397, 0.9067248702049255, 0.9226003289222717, 0.9219574332237244, 0.920164167881012, 0.8787432909011841, 0.9032257199287415, 0.9196586012840271, 0.9597212672233582, 0.9305583834648132, 0.9207327961921692, 0.7345894575119019, 0.9003950953483582, 0.9455708265304565, 0.9038671255111694, 0.8108556866645813, 0.8236337304115295, 0.9474908709526062, 0.897196888923645, 0.8825898766517639, 0.8971681594848633, 0.8903941512107849, 0.8712264895439148, 0.9007222056388855, 0.9000817537307739, 0.9077391028404236, 0.9078173041343689, 0.9513741135597229, 0.9278694987297058, 0.9454347491264343, 0.9305598139762878, 0.91279536485672, 0.8738154768943787, 0.9013272523880005, 0.8755937218666077, 0.7298030257225037, 0.9133222103118896, 0.9322064518928528, 0.8914898037910461, 0.8989391326904297, 0.9032900333404541, 0.8407848477363586, 0.9378150701522827, 0.9258336424827576, 0.9318547248840332, 0.8745810389518738, 0.8501575589179993, 0.9111424088478088, 0.887799084186554, 0.9195342063903809, 0.9003698825836182, 0.9070420861244202, 0.9553459286689758, 0.8648335337638855, 0.8971453309059143, 0.8274714350700378, 0.9312381148338318, 0.8699838519096375, 0.7421722412109375, 0.9315081834793091, 0.9658731818199158, 0.9573289752006531, 0.9456248879432678, 0.8811435103416443, 0.8931146264076233, 0.897882342338562, 0.8411956429481506, 0.9675679802894592, 0.8759508728981018, 0.8893535733222961, 0.8947553634643555, 0.9115211367607117, 0.9339679479598999, 0.8916324377059937, 0.9065272808074951, 0.930324137210846, 0.9244210124015808, 0.8990365266799927, 0.9325733184814453, 0.8991287350654602, 0.9095767736434937, 0.9236907362937927, 0.9380709528923035, 0.7887136340141296, 0.8745537400245667, 0.896600604057312, 0.9361998438835144, 0.947546124458313, 0.8344420194625854, 0.8381472229957581, 0.8429506421089172, 0.9355265498161316, 0.9001029133796692, 0.9136744141578674, 0.9119464755058289, 0.9171182513237, 0.9329491853713989, 0.9056907296180725, 0.9092667698860168, 0.9014247059822083, 0.8310412168502808, 0.8602723479270935, 0.8389685750007629, 0.8998615741729736, 0.9212885499000549, 0.9133400321006775, 0.8240143656730652, 0.9497202038764954, 0.9286305904388428, 0.9323942065238953, 0.8685566782951355, 0.85789954662323, 0.9245939254760742, 0.9374197721481323, 0.8740102648735046, 0.9044679999351501, 0.8745918273925781, 0.8897356986999512, 0.8998807072639465, 0.8698453307151794, 0.934392511844635, 0.9098460078239441, 0.8725189566612244, 0.9068921208381653, 0.9165294766426086, 0.8764563202857971, 0.9301850199699402, 0.8941149115562439, 0.9309175610542297, 0.941241979598999, 0.9612757563591003, 0.9283655881881714, 0.9220647215843201, 0.9078773856163025, 0.9471647143363953, 0.9663304686546326, 0.8836548924446106, 0.9037212133407593, 0.9143505096435547, 0.8885530829429626, 0.9309066534042358, 0.8637615442276001, 0.8843132853507996, 0.9598594307899475, 0.9464989900588989, 0.9098647832870483, 0.827258288860321, 0.8885220885276794, 0.8861545324325562, 0.8332418203353882, 0.8270320296287537, 0.8185453414916992, 0.8074157238006592, 0.9141107201576233, 0.8951207995414734, 0.8696070313453674, 0.8932428956031799, 0.9429222345352173, 0.8957023024559021, 0.9469470381736755, 0.9191872477531433, 0.8483132719993591, 0.935687243938446, 0.9484357833862305, 0.9367502927780151, 0.9389626383781433, 0.9257299304008484, 0.9238925576210022, 0.9319432973861694, 0.9301038384437561, 0.9439322352409363, 0.9213496446609497, 0.8716121315956116, 0.9104530811309814, 0.9567833542823792, 0.9111151099205017, 0.7301389575004578, 0.8931605219841003, 0.826099693775177, 0.8515565991401672, 0.9167965054512024, 0.8376340270042419, 0.9230615496635437, 0.885445773601532, 0.9360226988792419, 0.8833819031715393, 0.9014512896537781, 0.9155919551849365, 0.9324751496315002, 0.8182621598243713, 0.8439708352088928, 0.9384522438049316, 0.8858485817909241, 0.9161785244941711, 0.8612927198410034, 0.8177850842475891, 0.8587146401405334, 0.8362787365913391, 0.9370221495628357, 0.91413813829422, 0.9276986718177795, 0.9235022664070129, 0.9435232281684875, 0.9466869235038757, 0.9300765991210938, 0.8852992653846741, 0.9435772895812988, 0.879673957824707, 0.774147093296051, 0.8999928832054138, 0.8553758263587952, 0.9710106253623962, 0.9344732761383057, 0.936519980430603, 0.9091310501098633, 0.9120699763298035, 0.8424200415611267, 0.9460685849189758, 0.9338268041610718, 0.8854808211326599, 0.8826512098312378, 0.9299971461296082, 0.901115357875824, 0.8280647397041321, 0.8092859387397766, 0.8375157713890076, 0.9657719731330872, 0.8935915231704712, 0.96253502368927, 0.9197180867195129, 0.890129029750824, 0.9266335368156433, 0.9259831309318542, 0.9244231581687927, 0.9402928352355957, 0.8696675300598145, 0.9088155627250671, 0.9117180705070496, 0.9034894108772278, 0.9094087481498718, 0.8877477049827576, 0.8978920578956604, 0.9156777262687683, 0.8664275407791138, 0.9142901301383972, 0.8898885846138, 0.8796587586402893, 0.8419696092605591, 0.9088794589042664, 0.8624754548072815, 0.8842362761497498, 0.9125462174415588, 0.9373927116394043, 0.9330418705940247, 0.9275309443473816, 0.7865530252456665, 0.8841885328292847, 0.9262240529060364, 0.9030085802078247, 0.9714456796646118, 0.9535350203514099, 0.9083546996116638, 0.7925136089324951, 0.9719197154045105, 0.9475432634353638, 0.9072628617286682, 0.9123271703720093, 0.9121087789535522, 0.9305258393287659, 0.8143938779830933, 0.8835926055908203, 0.8913120031356812, 0.8804033398628235, 0.9053378105163574, 0.9016574621200562, 0.8637571930885315, 0.8875532150268555, 0.930149257183075, 0.9345459342002869, 0.9099701046943665, 0.9502682089805603, 0.9330739378929138, 0.9201933741569519, 0.97090083360672, 0.9254066944122314, 0.9186471104621887, 0.8544396758079529, 0.8536015152931213, 0.8720709085464478, 0.8672605156898499, 0.8949669003486633, 0.8260312080383301, 0.8596976399421692, 0.883329451084137, 0.9339367151260376, 0.9354085326194763, 0.9207718968391418, 0.8682985901832581, 0.8848298192024231, 0.8995741605758667, 0.9130043387413025, 0.8976446986198425, 0.9714242219924927, 0.9040680527687073, 0.9323819875717163, 0.9084543585777283, 0.9144683480262756, 0.8343847393989563, 0.8662260174751282, 0.8571453094482422, 0.8799818754196167, 0.898860514163971, 0.7805781960487366, 0.9358822703361511, 0.8762854933738708, 0.8539448976516724, 0.9090597033500671, 0.8422966599464417, 0.8218615651130676, 0.8059551119804382, 0.8197423219680786, 0.8750012516975403, 0.8880180716514587, 0.9430572390556335, 0.9229481816291809, 0.9514386057853699, 0.9444422125816345, 0.8769615292549133, 0.9214643239974976, 0.9291660189628601, 0.8521978259086609, 0.8595460057258606, 0.8994083404541016, 0.8824895620346069, 0.8807775378227234, 0.8397030234336853, 0.7809850573539734, 0.9236183762550354, 0.8980384469032288, 0.9120663404464722, 0.9291645288467407, 0.9188429713249207, 0.9544665813446045, 0.9289712309837341, 0.8796111345291138, 0.8531778454780579, 0.9740184545516968, 0.8493912220001221, 0.9211462736129761, 0.9382664561271667, 0.9031488299369812, 0.943484902381897, 0.888780415058136, 0.8725634217262268, 0.8797739148139954, 0.9216582775115967, 0.9092881083488464, 0.9366815090179443, 0.9362643361091614, 0.934831440448761, 0.8727706074714661, 0.8673483729362488, 0.90986567735672, 0.9438973069190979, 0.9109383821487427, 0.8890469074249268, 0.8939347863197327, 0.9182267785072327, 0.9466738700866699, 0.9467001557350159, 0.9262864589691162, 0.917748212814331, 0.7942802309989929, 0.9064537286758423, 0.9292466044425964, 0.927551805973053, 0.9282279014587402, 0.9010201692581177, 0.9167221188545227, 0.8728545308113098, 0.8251095414161682, 0.8541308045387268, 0.8138687014579773, 0.8922392725944519, 0.7685695290565491, 0.8609948754310608, 0.9656822085380554, 0.8994321227073669, 0.8457179069519043, 0.9372239708900452, 0.9294492602348328, 0.9489474892616272, 0.9154437184333801, 0.8890696167945862, 0.9044685959815979, 0.9556844234466553, 0.9381449818611145, 0.9455153942108154, 0.8479508757591248, 0.9377028942108154, 0.8922372460365295, 0.9450962543487549, 0.8848525285720825, 0.9031280279159546, 0.8586847186088562, 0.8657960295677185, 0.923259437084198, 0.9187466502189636, 0.898282527923584, 0.9494451880455017, 0.9027402400970459, 0.8842852711677551, 0.926640510559082, 0.9065474271774292, 0.8790760636329651, 0.9090529680252075, 0.7896050810813904, 0.8468503355979919, 0.8802950978279114, 0.8157956600189209, 0.8291836380958557, 0.9037461280822754, 0.8972101807594299, 0.8366480469703674, 0.909724771976471, 0.8604296445846558, 0.9259757399559021, 0.9082744717597961, 0.9305245280265808, 0.8976234793663025, 0.881472647190094, 0.9019129872322083, 0.9115071296691895, 0.9127939343452454, 0.8595372438430786, 0.9380573630332947, 0.818534791469574, 0.9290011525154114, 0.907943606376648, 0.8988783955574036, 0.9372485876083374, 0.8806158900260925, 0.8985826373100281, 0.9128078818321228, 0.8585623502731323, 0.9034073352813721, 0.9180207848548889, 0.9524467587471008, 0.9264904856681824, 0.9512676000595093, 0.9613809585571289, 0.929306149482727, 0.9097246527671814, 0.8147451281547546, 0.8294491171836853, 0.7824918627738953, 0.8779737949371338, 0.9115012288093567, 0.8893353343009949, 0.8296410441398621, 0.8091544508934021, 0.9198060631752014, 0.8619502186775208, 0.8711827993392944, 0.8441460728645325, 0.8722121715545654, 0.9579691886901855, 0.9114009737968445, 0.9413217902183533, 0.8834995031356812, 0.9451568722724915, 0.9249414205551147, 0.8945867419242859, 0.9472792148590088, 0.892340898513794, 0.9198777675628662, 0.8070982098579407, 0.868015706539154, 0.8861822485923767, 0.8811293840408325, 0.9006951451301575, 0.8401902318000793, 0.8925145864486694, 0.8883115649223328, 0.9154400825500488, 0.8768042922019958, 0.856959879398346, 0.9273585677146912, 0.9223424196243286, 0.8895437121391296, 0.942818820476532, 0.901877760887146, 0.8997016549110413, 0.8617419600486755, 0.9436262249946594, 0.7358381748199463, 0.8754978775978088, 0.8726546764373779, 0.9258015155792236, 0.8650005459785461, 0.934244692325592, 0.9251384139060974, 0.9314589500427246, 0.925224781036377, 0.90412837266922, 0.8702008128166199, 0.8919146656990051, 0.8342967629432678, 0.8208672404289246, 0.9490318894386292, 0.9358824491500854, 0.9116249680519104, 0.8656287789344788, 0.8894205093383789, 0.9180364012718201, 0.8749408721923828, 0.8910014629364014, 0.8828476667404175, 0.8366662859916687, 0.9279791712760925, 0.9276344180107117, 0.8867469429969788, 0.938226580619812, 0.9495256543159485, 0.7938907742500305, 0.8907706141471863, 0.93055260181427, 0.9164964556694031, 0.9348737597465515, 0.9177884459495544, 0.9468181729316711, 0.8820518255233765, 0.7688391804695129, 0.7295159101486206, 0.9004586935043335, 0.9178803563117981, 0.8662729859352112, 0.9066070914268494, 0.8538163304328918, 0.9005575180053711, 0.9152641892433167, 0.8294374942779541, 0.9443108439445496, 0.9048193693161011, 0.9249923825263977, 0.9324612617492676, 0.8769187331199646, 0.8627408742904663, 0.9264158606529236, 0.9037488102912903, 0.8884440064430237, 0.9275359511375427, 0.9287464618682861, 0.8964685201644897, 0.9153396487236023, 0.805458128452301, 0.7516941428184509, 0.899949312210083, 0.8805963397026062, 0.9373896718025208, 0.9365862011909485, 0.9346649050712585, 0.9120230078697205, 0.9396776556968689, 0.9525999426841736, 0.948593020439148, 0.9440475702285767, 0.9231265783309937, 0.9199215769767761, 0.9467580914497375, 0.8985970616340637, 0.9381992220878601, 0.9366142153739929, 0.8734063506126404, 0.9306987524032593, 0.9152367115020752, 0.9180884957313538, 0.9419272541999817, 0.9150611162185669, 0.8284876346588135, 0.9098511934280396, 0.9616973996162415, 0.9449111819267273, 0.9726925492286682, 0.9121062159538269, 0.913152813911438, 0.9138047099113464, 0.9366388916969299, 0.965570330619812, 0.9205862879753113, 0.9580570459365845, 0.8810752034187317, 0.9099556803703308, 0.8712164759635925, 0.8271437287330627, 0.9227816462516785, 0.9107824563980103, 0.8465388417243958, 0.9060196280479431, 0.9597457051277161, 0.8921183347702026, 0.8521704077720642, 0.8386831283569336, 0.9073073863983154, 0.9504337906837463, 0.9076332449913025, 0.9386484026908875, 0.880591630935669, 0.9125746488571167, 0.8748419880867004, 0.9406258463859558, 0.9369955658912659, 0.9249017834663391, 0.9616270661354065, 0.9110628366470337, 0.9415649771690369, 0.9427952170372009, 0.8972132802009583, 0.9271793961524963, 0.8922925591468811, 0.9402179718017578, 0.9179623126983643, 0.9171958565711975, 0.8735181093215942, 0.8978877663612366, 0.9378047585487366, 0.9250052571296692, 0.9319117665290833, 0.941162645816803, 0.8898478150367737, 0.9590665698051453, 0.8988625407218933, 0.8905699849128723, 0.8767576813697815, 0.9325476884841919, 0.9259342551231384, 0.8669659495353699, 0.9201771020889282, 0.8981181383132935, 0.9364060759544373, 0.8773654699325562, 0.9102550148963928, 0.8611428141593933, 0.8431580662727356, 0.9204896092414856, 0.914286732673645, 0.8869860768318176, 0.9359049201011658, 0.9267963767051697, 0.8579012751579285, 0.9406910538673401, 0.9555844664573669, 0.8951981663703918, 0.9054974913597107, 0.9115862250328064, 0.826643168926239, 0.912797212600708, 0.9219183325767517, 0.9153295159339905, 0.9271485209465027, 0.8358907103538513, 0.9324029088020325, 0.8837139010429382, 0.8957318663597107, 0.8846964836120605, 0.9051526784896851, 0.9232804775238037, 0.9107137322425842, 0.8727777600288391, 0.873116135597229, 0.886267364025116, 0.8821895122528076, 0.9329579472541809, 0.9507868885993958, 0.9160124659538269, 0.8698517084121704, 0.892190158367157, 0.842841386795044, 0.8931305408477783, 0.9209855198860168, 0.915985107421875, 0.8603468537330627, 0.9336533546447754, 0.8527201414108276, 0.8590337038040161, 0.9194221496582031, 0.8833762407302856, 0.9058083891868591, 0.8953185677528381, 0.9481506943702698, 0.8599116206169128, 0.8569076657295227, 0.9348028302192688, 0.8699430823326111, 0.927146315574646, 0.9014105200767517, 0.8917384743690491, 0.922857940196991, 0.9004377722740173, 0.957228422164917, 0.9384766221046448, 0.8932064175605774, 0.8984845280647278, 0.9127084612846375, 0.9152950644493103, 0.8541595339775085, 0.895719587802887, 0.8866098523139954, 0.9080917835235596, 0.946323812007904, 0.9328955411911011, 0.9546992182731628, 0.9033475518226624, 0.8974155783653259, 0.8760809302330017, 0.8975053429603577, 0.8826239705085754, 0.9290902614593506, 0.9720221757888794, 0.8788318037986755, 0.9416372179985046, 0.8734776377677917, 0.8751985430717468, 0.8724061250686646, 0.9191011786460876, 0.8754117488861084, 0.8990713953971863, 0.9175998568534851, 0.846426784992218, 0.9121121764183044, 0.867020845413208, 0.9014501571655273, 0.8767244815826416, 0.8796678185462952, 0.8406502604484558, 0.9253011345863342, 0.9174941182136536, 0.9156593084335327, 0.9072864055633545, 0.9281627535820007, 0.8922748565673828, 0.86766117811203, 0.9166876673698425, 0.8839768171310425, 0.9025577902793884, 0.9677708745002747, 0.8379974961280823, 0.9142159819602966, 0.8853381872177124, 0.9222403764724731, 0.8920376896858215, 0.8639846444129944, 0.8983153700828552, 0.8339839577674866, 0.9239597916603088, 0.9220358729362488, 0.8425507545471191, 0.8770458102226257, 0.8909157514572144, 0.9436577558517456, 0.7040912508964539, 0.9401782751083374, 0.9433989524841309, 0.9367398619651794, 0.8568436503410339, 0.8661888837814331, 0.8428501486778259, 0.8321431279182434, 0.9036206007003784, 0.9429697394371033, 0.9486175179481506, 0.8335349559783936, 0.8791788220405579, 0.9379606246948242, 0.9515101313591003, 0.9000455737113953, 0.9097137451171875, 0.9163171648979187, 0.8825963735580444, 0.8758850693702698, 0.911917507648468, 0.8765367865562439, 0.8595910668373108, 0.8933508992195129, 0.880741536617279, 0.9254478216171265, 0.9566166996955872, 0.9098699688911438, 0.8407999873161316, 0.9035122394561768, 0.8599928021430969, 0.8264503479003906, 0.8986276388168335, 0.865060031414032, 0.8096736073493958, 0.839501678943634, 0.8857120871543884, 0.7924285531044006, 0.9005039930343628, 0.8845188021659851, 0.9247727990150452, 0.8778878450393677, 0.7365756630897522, 0.8449342846870422, 0.8854539394378662, 0.835269033908844, 0.9205625653266907, 0.9246484041213989, 0.9150516390800476, 0.9087851047515869, 0.9232593178749084, 0.9329655766487122, 0.9215559959411621, 0.8955041766166687, 0.8071279525756836, 0.8988286852836609, 0.9073540568351746, 0.9294288754463196, 0.873773455619812, 0.9430962800979614, 0.8173567652702332, 0.915380597114563, 0.933607280254364, 0.8761173486709595, 0.8733847737312317, 0.878588080406189, 0.906263530254364, 0.9329817295074463, 0.8984102606773376, 0.9157205820083618, 0.9087508320808411, 0.932249128818512, 0.9243103861808777, 0.8439390063285828, 0.927011251449585, 0.927239179611206, 0.8767328858375549, 0.8070325255393982, 0.8766634464263916, 0.9157401919364929, 0.8870776295661926, 0.8440867066383362, 0.8132092952728271, 0.8952811360359192, 0.9305199384689331, 0.9159185886383057, 0.875727117061615, 0.8811234831809998, 0.9132913947105408, 0.8857463598251343, 0.8590864539146423, 0.9261630177497864, 0.9105880856513977, 0.9092092514038086, 0.8869959712028503, 0.8871735334396362, 0.8889886736869812, 0.861544668674469, 0.9539231657981873, 0.8797257542610168, 0.8819882273674011, 0.94148188829422, 0.928699791431427, 0.9189924597740173, 0.9127106070518494, 0.9166832566261292, 0.8413882851600647, 0.9298216700553894, 0.9134861826896667, 0.8482100963592529, 0.7602617144584656, 0.9181142449378967, 0.8911355137825012, 0.9026278853416443, 0.9002289772033691, 0.8873853087425232, 0.9087679386138916, 0.9103124737739563, 0.8717392086982727, 0.9291679263114929, 0.8739433288574219, 0.8720141649246216, 0.8970550894737244, 0.8976755738258362, 0.8725667595863342, 0.9017168879508972, 0.9337281584739685, 0.9558184742927551, 0.9283151626586914, 0.9304240942001343, 0.9642189741134644, 0.9188380837440491, 0.9170333743095398, 0.8720329999923706, 0.9390065670013428, 0.8898577690124512, 0.9167472720146179, 0.8734898567199707, 0.9285485148429871, 0.8672959208488464, 0.8668937087059021, 0.8699721693992615, 0.9634026885032654, 0.8309289813041687, 0.915280282497406, 0.89878910779953, 0.937920093536377, 0.9066140055656433, 0.9502015113830566, 0.8664354681968689, 0.837215006351471, 0.9252934455871582, 0.9092037081718445, 0.9501964449882507, 0.8589277863502502, 0.9205777049064636, 0.8405159115791321, 0.8837565779685974, 0.830353319644928, 0.9309753179550171, 0.8940017223358154, 0.9056336283683777, 0.9721760153770447, 0.9004240036010742, 0.9413455128669739, 0.8541433215141296, 0.9022223949432373, 0.9557490944862366, 0.8902357220649719, 0.8763555288314819, 0.8954359889030457, 0.9042990803718567, 0.8678350448608398, 0.9476071000099182, 0.9190559387207031, 0.9346858263015747, 0.9299755692481995, 0.8598354458808899, 0.8411451578140259, 0.9359921813011169, 0.8980699181556702, 0.929839551448822, 0.8887819647789001, 0.9237115979194641, 0.8358092904090881, 0.9818360209465027, 0.959294319152832, 0.9136014580726624, 0.8923146724700928, 0.922831118106842, 0.8783382177352905, 0.9361106157302856, 0.8713469505310059, 0.9250120520591736, 0.9181095957756042, 0.8411453366279602, 0.9285144209861755, 0.9157687425613403, 0.9298973083496094, 0.9339169859886169, 0.9268316626548767]}